District of Columbia statutes.
28-2110

Notice to creditors.

The court shall require a trustee, whether named in the assignment or appointed by the court, in pursuance of this chapter, to give notice as the court may think proper to all the creditors of the assignor to produce and prove their respective claims against the assignor before the auditor of the court, to the end that they may be fairly adjudicated and the creditors may share equally the assets of the insolvent assignor, subject, however, to any legal priorities created by valid incumbrances antedating the assignment.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 28-2110.
1973 Ed., § 28-2110.

Prior Codifications